Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1722.01
Transaction; exemption from act; provisions applicable.

Any transaction in which the purchaser makes or will become obligated to make a total initial payment of an amount not exceeding five hundred dollars shall be exempt from the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act, except that such transactions shall be subject to section 59-1751, to subdivision (1)(d) of section 59-1757, and to those provisions in the act regulating or prescribing the use of the phrase buy-back or secured investment or similar phrases as set forth in sections 59-1726 to 59-1728.

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 44.